Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1645.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 63 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3121. Limitations on discipline.(a) Limitations.--A person shall not be disqualified from licensure or subject to discipline by a licensing board or licensing commission due to any of the following: (1) The applicant or license, certificate, registration or permit holder provided or assisted in the provision of reproductive health care services.(2) As consequence of a judgment, discipline or other sanction intended to be imposed or imposed under the laws of another state on the applicant or license, certificate, 1234567891011121314151617 registration or permit holder who assisted in the provision of reproductive health care services if the services would have been lawful and consistent with standards for good professional practice in this Commonwealth.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the term "reproductive health care services" means medical, surgical, counseling or referral services relating to the human reproductive system, including services relating to pregnancy, contraception or the termination of pregnancy.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1645PN1995 - 2 - 12345678910